src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun !!= @CODE@ on kokeellinen leksikko
Ap:Ap2 vanha_nocmp_prop_org_21C ;   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
AKP vanha_prop_org_21 ;
Oa vanha_nocmp_prop_org_21 ;
Ra vanha_nocmp_prop_org_21 ;
Enontekiö:Enon#tekiö vanha_prop_plc_31_io ;
Kalliomaa:Kallio#maa vanha_prop_surplc_31 ;
Kylmämaa:Kylmä#maa vanha_prop_sur_31 ;
Kananoja:Kanan#oja vanha_prop_sur_11_AO_A2I ;
Tuomenoja:Tuomen#oja vanha_prop_surplc_11_AO_A2I ;
Löytynoja:Löytyn#oja vanha_prop_sur_11_AO_A2I ;
Käräjäoja:Käräjä#oja vanha_prop_surplc_11_AO_A2I ;
Polstjerna vanha_prop_obj_21 ;
Eira vanha_prop_surfem_21 ;
Fortaleza vanha_prop_plc_21 ;
Ed vanha_nocmp_prop_plc_21C ;
Inge vanha_prop_malfem_21 ;
Skauge vanha_prop_sur_21 ;
Ferie vanha_prop_org_21 ;
Torje vanha_prop_fem_21 ;
Giuseppe vanha_prop_mal_21 ;
Terese vanha_prop_fem_22odd ;
MacWrite vanha_prop_obj_21 ;
If vanha_nocmp_prop_org_21C ;
Liettuu vanha_prop_plc_21ii ;
Ai vanha_nocmp_prop_surplc_21 ;
Puoliväli vanha_prop_surplc_21 ;
Lähdeniemi:Lähde#nieme vanha_prop_sur_21ie ;
Särkiniemi:Särki#nie vanha_prop_plc_21niemi ;
Jussinniemi:Jussin#nieme vanha_prop_sur_21ie ;
Kari vanha_prop_malfem_21 ;
Jokisaari:Joki#saare vanha_prop_sur_21ta ;
Merisaari:Meri#saare vanha_prop_sur_21ta ;
Kivisaari:Kivi#saare vanha_prop_plc_21ta ;
Sammeli vanha_prop_mal_21_odd_i ; 
Kainhuunmeri:Kainhuun#mere vanha_prop_plc_21ta ;
Lääveri vanha_prop_sur_21 ;
Mati vanha_prop_mal_21 ;
Anatolij vanha_prop_mal_21C ;
Ek vanha_nocmp_prop_sur_21C ;
Vrådal vanha_prop_plc_21C ;
Memorial vanha_prop_org_21C ;
Bodil vanha_prop_fem_21C ;
On vanha_nocmp_prop_surplc_21C ;
Máijan vanha_prop_21C ; ! is this correct, or Essive?
Joan vanha_prop_mal_21C ;
Fortran vanha_prop_obj_21C ;
Haandværksdriften vanha_prop_org_21C ;
Svarten vanha_prop_ani_21C ;
Gråen vanha_prop_ani_21C ;
Robin vanha_prop_malfem_21C ;
Pipin vanha_prop_surmal_21C ;
Limousin vanha_prop_obj_21C ;
Henderson vanha_prop_sur_21C ;
Lilletun vanha_prop_surplc_21C ;
Stryn vanha_prop_plc_21C ;
Po vanha_nocmp_prop_mal_21 ;
Vo vanha_nocmp_prop_mal_21 ;
Tornio vanha_prop_22oi ;
Alattii vanha_prop_plc_21ii ;
Us vanha_nocmp_prop_surplc_21C ;
Ås vanha_nocmp_prop_plc_21C ;
Bu vanha_nocmp_prop_plc_21 ;
Wu vanha_nocmp_prop_21 ;
Eau vanha_prop_21 ;
Isokarhuu vanha_prop_plc_31uu ;
Mølby vanha_prop_21 ;
Marry vanha_prop_fem_21 ;
Ketty vanha_prop_ani_21 ;
Levy vanha_prop_ani_21 ;
Ramsøy vanha_prop_plc_21 ;
Nå vanha_nocmp_prop_plc_21 ;
Sø vanha_nocmp_prop_21 ;
Aasebø vanha_prop_21 ;
Enoš vanha_prop_surmal_21 ;
Falastat:Falastat2 vanha_prop_21C ;
Margit:Margit2 vanha_prop_fem_21C ;
Frøydis:Frøydi vanha_prop_fem_41 ;
Jebens vanha_prop_sur_21Cv ;
Frostvikens vanha_prop_plc_21Cv ;
Arostobulos:Arostobulo vanha_prop_surplc_41 ;
Caithness:Caithnes vanha_prop_plc_41 ;
Kattfoss:Kattfoss vanha_prop_plc_21Cv ;
Markhus:Markhus vanha_prop_sur_21Cv ;
Kefevs:Kefev vanha_prop_mal_41 ;
Haykås:Hayk#å vanha_prop_sur_41 ;
Lemesós:Lemesó vanha_prop_surmal_41 ;
Ylimaa:Yli#maa vanha_prop_plc_31 ;
Rottiniemenkorkea:Rottiniemenkorkea vanha_prop_plc_31ea ;
Santia:Santia vanha_prop_fem_31ia ;
Sappirjoensokka:Sappir#joen#sokka vanha_prop_plc_11_AO_A2I ;
Lombola:Lombola vanha_prop_plc_21_oi_AO ;
Sarvola:Sarvola vanha_prop_plc_21_oi_AO ;
Alainenvuoma:Alainen#vuoma vanha_prop_plc_11_AO_A2I ;
Samettiaapa:Sametti#aapa vanha_prop_plc_11_AO  ;
Jaamisvaara:Jaamisvaara vanha_prop_plc_11_AO ;
Kulpukantie:Kulpukan#tie vanha_prop_1 ;
Sisäpääntie:Sisäpään#tie vanha_prop_1 ;
Maskijoki:Maski#joke vanha_prop_plc_21ie ;
Kolmihaarainen-Kurunjoki:Kolmihaarainen-Kurun#joke vanha_prop_plc_21ie ;
Preussi vanha_prop_plc_21_odd_i ;
Sulaniemi:Sula#nieme vanha_prop_surplc_21ie ;
Morttiniemi:Mortti#nie vanha_prop_plc_21niemi ;
Rautusniemi:Rautus#nieme vanha_prop_surplc_21ie ;
Pillasaari:Pilla#saare vanha_prop_surplc_21ta ;
Pikku% Kuoskinsaari:Pikku% Kuoskin#saare vanha_prop_surplc_21ta ;
Onkajärvi:Onka#järve vanha_prop_21ie ;
Pollojärvi:Pollo#järve vanha_prop_21ie ;
Kairanen:Kairanen vanha_prop_x ;
Jellisuanto:Jellisuanto vanha_prop_plc_22odd ;
Vesipahđat:Vesipahđat vanha_prop_x ;
Pramminjänkkä:Prammin#jänkkä vanha_prop_plc_11_ae ;
Mariatörmä:Maria#törmä vanha_prop_plc_11_ae ;
